Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ST. CLOUD AREA SCHOOL DISTRICT PRESCHOOL PROGRAMS GRANT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Children, Youth, and Families. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Children, Youth, and Families for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin St. Cloud Area School District preschool programs grant. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to Independent School District No. 742, St. Cloud, for the Preschool 4 Success program operated with the Rotary Club of St. Cloud: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 155,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 155,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, up to three percent of the appropriation is available for grant administration. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation. The fiscal year 2026 appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. The fiscal year 2027 appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. new text end